Utah statutes.
77-20b-105.   Revocation of bond.

The surety is entitled to obtain the exoneration of its bond prior to judgment by providing written proof to the court and the prosecutor that:

(1)  the defendant has been booked for failure to appear regarding the charge for which the bond was issued; or

(2)  the defendant is in custody and the surety has served the defendant's bond revocation on the custodial authority.

